Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-761
Mentor teacher programs; State Board of Education; duties.

The State Board of Education shall develop guidelines for mentor teacher programs in local systems in order to provide ongoing support for individuals entering the teaching profession. The mentor teacher programs shall identify criteria for selecting excellent, experienced, and qualified teachers to be participants.

Laws 1998, LB 1228, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 1208, § 3.